Massachusetts, session 194th, H2430.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 110A of Chapter 111 of the General Laws, , is hereby amended by inserting after
the word “ phenylketonuria ,” in line 2, the following words:- Krabbe Leukodystrophy and other
lysomal storage disorders, “
of 1